lt-LT: Apsaugos algoritmai: 1024 bitų RSA; 104 bitų WEP; 104 bitų WEP; 128 bitų RC4; 128 bitų SSL; 128 bitų WEP; 152 bitų WEP; 192 bitų WEP; 2048 bitų RSA; 256 bitų WEP; 256 bitų AES-XTS; 256 bitų „TwoFish“; 256 bitų WEP; 384 bitų AES; 3DES; 40 bitų WEP; 4096 bitų RSA; 512 bitų AES; 56 bitų AES; 64 bitų AES; 64 bitų WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nepalaikoma; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Kita
hu: Biztonsági algoritmusok: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nem támogatott; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Egyéb
es: Algoritmos de seguridad: RSA de 1024 bits; WEP de 104 bits; AES de 128 bits; RC4 de 128 bits; SSL de 128 bits; WEP de 128 bits; WEP de 152 bits; AES de 192 bits; RSA de 2048 bits; AES de 256 bits; AES de 256 bits; TwoFish de 256 bits; WEP de 256 bits; AES de 384 bits; 3DES; WEP de 40 bits; RSA de 4096 bits; AES de 512 bits; AES de 56 bits; AES de 64 bits; WEP de 64 bits; Radio 802.1x; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; No compatible; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Otros
sv: Säkerhetsalgoritmer: 1024-bitars RSA; 104-bitars WEP; 128-bitars AES; 128-bitars RC4; 128-bitars SSL; 128-bitars WEP; 152-bitars WEP; 192-bitars AES; 2048-bitars RSA; 256-bitars AES; 256-bitars AES-XTS; 256-bitars TwoFish; 256-bitars WEP; 384-bitars AES; 3DES; 40-bitars WEP; 4096-bitars RSA; 512-bitars AES; 56-bitars AES; 64-bitars AES; 64-bitars WEP; 802.1x radie; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Stöds inte; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Annat
tr: Güvenlik Algoritmaları: 1024-bit RSA; 104 bit WEP; 128 bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128 bit SSL; 128 bit WEP; 152 bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Desteklenmiyor; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Diğer
pl: Algorytmy bezpieczeństwa: 1024-bitowy RSA; 104-bitowy WEP; 128-bitowy AES; 128-bitowy RC4; 128-bitowy SSL; 128-bitowy WEP; 152-bitowy WEP; 192-bitowy AES; 2048-bitowy RSA; 256-bitowy AES; 256-bitowy AES-XTS; 256-bitowy TwoFish; 256-bitowy WEP; 384-bitowy AES; 3DES; 40-bitowy WEP; 4096-bitowy RSA; 512-bitowy AES; 56-bitowy AES; 64-bitowy AES; 64-bitowy WEP; Promień 802.1x; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nieobsługiwane; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; DPS; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Algoritmos de segurança: RSA de 1024 bits; WEP de 104 bits; AES de 128 bits; RC4 de 128 bits; SSL de 128 bits; WEP de 128 bits; WEP de 152 bits; AES de 192 bits; RSA de 2048 bits; AES de 256 bits; AES-XTS de 256 bits; TwoFish de 256 bits; WEP de 256 bits; AES de 384 bits; 3DES; WEP de 40 bits; RSA de 4096 bits; AES de 512 bits; AES de 56 bits; AES de 64 bits; WEP de 64 bits; Raio 802,1x; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Não compatível; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Outro
fi: Turvallisuusalgoritmit: 1024-bittinen RSA; 104-bittinen WEP; 128-bittinen AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bittinen SSL; 128-bittinen WEP; 152-bittinen WEP; 192-bittinen AES; 2048-bittinen RSA; 256-bittinen AES; 256-bittinen AES; 256-bittinen TwoFish; 256-bittinen WEP; 384-bittinen AES; 3DES; 40-bittinen WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bittinen AES; 56-bittinen AES; 64-bittinen AES; 64-bittinen WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Ei tuettu; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Muu
nl: Beveiligingsalgoritmen: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bits WEP; 128-bits AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bits WEP; 152-bits WEP; 192-bits AES; 2048-bits RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Niet ondersteund; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Andere
zh-CN: 安全算法: 1024 位 RSA; 104 位 WEP; 128 位 AES; 128 位 RC4; 128 位 SSL; 128 位 WEP; 152 位 WEP; 192 位 AES; 2048 位 RSA; 256 位 AES; 256 位 AES-XTS; 256 位 TwoFish; 256 位 WEP; 384 位 AES; 3DES; 40 位 WEP; 4096 位 RSA; 512 位 AES; 56 位 AES; 64 位 AES; 64 位 WEP; 802.1x 半径; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; 不支持; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; 其他
vi: Thuật toán bảo mật: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Không hỗ trợ; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Khác
ko: 보안 알고리즘: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; 지원되지 않음; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; 기타
el: Αλγόριθμοι ασφαλείας: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Δεν υποστηρίζεται; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Άλλο
bg-BG: Алгоритми за сигурност: 1024-битов RSA; 104-битов WEP; 128-битов AES; 128-битов RC4; 128-битов SSL; 128-битов WEP; 152-битов WEP; 192-битов AES; 2048-битов RSA; 256-битов AES; 256-битов AES-XTS; 256-битов TwoFish; 256-битов WEP; 384-битов AES; 3DES; 40-битов WEP; 4096-битов RSA; 512-битов AES; 56-битов AES; 64-битов AES; 64-битов WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Не се поддържа; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Други
hr-HR: Sigurnosni algoritmi: 1024-bitni RSA; 104-bitni WEP; 128-bitni AES; 128-bitni RC4; 128-bitni SSL; 128-bitni WEP; 152-bitni WEP; 192-bitni AES; 2048-bitni RSA; 256-bitni AES; 256-bitni AES; 256-bitni TwoFish; 256-bitni WEP; 384-bitni AES; 3DES; 40-bitni WEP; 4096-bitni RSA; 512-bitni AES; 56-bitni AES; 64-bitni AES; 64-bitni WEP; 802.1 x polumjer; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nije podržano; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Ostalo
sl-SI: Varnostni algoritmi: 1024-bitni RSA; 104-bitni WEP; 128-bitni AES; 128-bitni RC4; 128-bitni SSL; 128-bitni WEP; 152-bitni WEP; 192-bitni AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bitni AES; 256-bitni AES-XTS; 256-bitni TwoFish; 256-bitni WEP; 384-bitni AES; 3DES; 40-bitni WEP; 4096-bitni RSA; 512-bitni AES; 56-bitni AES; 64-bitni AES; 64-bitni WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Ni podprto; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Drugo
it: Algoritmi di sicurezza: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Non supportata; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Altro
de: Sicherheitsalgorithmen: 1024-Bit-RSA; 104-Bit-WEP; 128-Bit-AES; 128-Bit RC4; 128-Bit-SSL; 128-Bit-WEP; 152-Bit-WEP; 192-Bit-AES; 2048-Bit-RSA; 256-Bit-AES; 256-Bit-AES-XTS; 256-Bit-TwoFish; 256-Bit-WEP; 384-Bit-AES; 3DES; 40-Bit-WEP; 4096-Bit-RSA; 512-Bit-AES; 56-Bit-AES; 64-Bit-AES; 64-Bit-WEP; 802.1x Radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nicht unterstützt; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Sonstiges
da: Sikkerhedsalgoritmer: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Ikke understøttet; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Andet
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné algoritmy: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; Polomer 802,1x; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; SKOK; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nie je podporované; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-podnik; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Iné
ro-RO: Algoritmi de securitate: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; AES pe 128 de biți; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-RAPID; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Neacceptat; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-AES; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-AES; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PBC; WPS-USB; Altele
ru: Алгоритмы безопасности: 1024 бита RSA; 104 бита WEP; 128 бит AES; 128 бит RC4; 128 бит SSL; 128 бит WEP; 152 бита WEP; 192 бита AES; 2048 бит RSA; 256 бит AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256 бит TwoFish; 256 бит WEP; 384 бита AES; 3DES; 40 бит WEP; 4096 бит RSA; 512 бит AES; 56 бит AES; 64 бит AES; 64 бит WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Не поддерживается; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Другой
th: อัลกอริธึมความปลอดภัย: RSA 1024 บิต; WEP 104 บิต; AES 128 บิต; RC4 128 บิต; SSL 128 บิต; WEP 128 บิต; WEP 152 บิต; AES 192 บิต; RSA 2048 บิต; AES 256 บิต; AES-XTS 256 บิต; ทูฟิช 256 บิต; WEP 256 บิต; AES 384 บิต; 3DES; WEP 40 บิต; RSA 4096 บิต; AES 512 บิต; AES 56 บิต; AES 64 บิต; WEP 64 บิต; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; ไม่รองรับ; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-Enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-Enterprise; WPA2-Enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-Enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; อื่นๆ
nb: Sikkerhetsalgoritmer: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-biters SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802,1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Ikke støttet; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Annen
en: Security algorithms: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Not supported; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Other
zh-TW: 安全演算法: 1024 位元 RSA; 104 位元 WEP; 128 位元 AES; 128 位元 RC4; 128 位元 SSL; 128 位元 WEP; 152 位元 WEP; 192 位元 AES; 2048 位元 RSA; 256 位元 AES; 256 位元 AES-XTS; 256 位元 TwoFish; 256 位元 WEP; 384 位元 AES; 3DES; 40 位元 WEP; 4096 位元 RSA; 512 位元 AES; 56 位元 AES; 64 位元 AES; 64 位元 WEP; 802.1x 半徑; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; 不支援; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA 企業級; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2 企業級; WPA2 企業級 PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3 企業級; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; 其他
fr: Algorithmes de sécurité: RSA 1 024 bits; WEP 104 bits; AES 128 bits; RC4 128 bits; SSL 128 bits; WEP 128 bits; WEP 152 bits; AES 192 bits; RSA 2 048 bits; AES 256 bits; AES-XTS 256 bits; TwoFish 256 bits; WEP 256 bits; AES 384 bits; 3DES; WEP 40 bits; RSA 4 096 bits; AES 512 bits; AES 56 bits; AES 64 bits; WEP 64 bits; RADIUS 802.1X; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; PAE; EAP-AKA; PAE-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Non pris en charge; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; RAYON WPA; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Autre
pt-PT: Algoritmos de segurança: RSA de 1024 bits; WEP de 104 bits; AES de 128 bits; RC4 de 128 bits; SSL de 128 bits; WEP de 128 bits; WEP de 152 bits; AES de 192 bits; RSA de 2048 bits; AES de 256 bits; AES-XTS de 256 bits; TwoFish de 256 bits; WEP de 256 bits; AES de 384 bits; 3DES; WEP de 40 bits; RSA de 4096 bits; AES de 512 bits; AES de 56 bits; AES de 64 bits; WEP de 64 bits; Raio 802.1x; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Não suportado; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-Enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-Enterprise; WPA2-Enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-Enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Outro
cs: Bezpečnostní algoritmy: 1024bitový RSA; 104bitový WEP; 128bitový AES; 128bitový RC4; 128bitový SSL; 128bitový WEP; 104bitový WEP; 192bitový AES; 2048bitový RSA; 256bitový AES; 256bitový AES-XTS; 256bitový TwoFish; 256bitový WEP; 384bitový AES; 3DES; 40bitový WEP; 4096bitový RSA; 512bitový AES; 56bitový AES; 64bitový AES; 64bitový WEP; 802.1x radius; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; Nepodporováno; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPA-enterprise; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2-enterprise; WPA2-enterprise-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3-enterprise; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; Jiné
ja: セキュリティアルゴリズム: 1024-bit RSA; 104-bit WEP; 128-bit AES; 128-bit RC4; 128-bit SSL; 128-bit WEP; 152-bit WEP; 192-bit AES; 2048-bit RSA; 256-bit AES; 256-bit AES-XTS; 256-bit TwoFish; 256-bit WEP; 384-bit AES; 3DES; 40-bit WEP; 4096-bit RSA; 512-bit AES; 56-bit AES; 64-bit AES; 64-bit WEP; 802.1x RADIUS; AES; AES-CCMP; AES-GCMP; APOP; CAST; CCX v4; DES; EAP; EAP-AKA; EAP-FAST; EAP-GTC; EAP-LEAP; EAP-MD5; EAP-PEAP; EAP-PWD; EAP-SIM; EAP-TLS; EAP-TTLS; FIPS 140; FIPS 140-2; FIPS 140-3; FIPS 197; FTPES; HTTPS; IPPS; IPSec; LEAP; MD5; MSCHAPv2; 非対応; PEAP; RSA; RipeMD160; SHA-1; SHA-2; SHA-256; SHA-384; SHA-512; SIPS; SMTP-AUTH; SNMP; SNMPv2; SNMPv3; SRTP; SSH; SSH-1.5; SSH-2; SSID; SSL/TLS; TKIP; TLS; TTLS; WAPI; WDS; WEP; WHQL; WMM; WPA; WPA-AES; WPA-EAP; WPA-PSK; WPA-RADIUS; WPA-SDK; WPA-TKIP; WPAエンタープライズ; WPA2; WPA2-AES; WPA2-CCMP; WPA2-EAP; WPA2-PSK; WPA2-RADIUS; WPA2-TKIP; WPA2エンタープライズ; WPA2エンタープライズ-PEAP; WPA3; WPA3-EAP; WPA3-PSK; WPA3-SAE; WPA3エンタープライズ; WPS; WPS-NFC; WPS-PBC; WPS-PIN; WPS-USB; その他